Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1939.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 443.16. Fee Schedule Rates.--(a) Subject to Federal approval and in addition to 55 Pa. Code § 6100.571 (relating to fee schedule rates), the following applies to the fee schedule rates for home and community-based services provided through intellectual disability and autism programs administered by the Office of Developmental Programs for the twelve-month period beginning October 1, 2026, and each October 1 thereafter:(1) To the extent funds are appropriated for the purposes under this section, the fee schedule rates shall be increased by 123456789101112131415161718 the percentage change to the Consumer Price Index for the most recently reported twelve-month period.(2) If the increase to the fee schedule rates under paragraph (1) will result in the total estimated expenditures exceeding the funds appropriated for the purpose, the percentage increase to the fee schedule rates shall be limited by the amount appropriated.(3) If no change or a decrease occurs in the Consumer Price Index under paragraph (1), the fee schedule rates for home and community-based services under this section shall remain unchanged for the year. For any year in which the Consumer Price Index increases following a year of decrease, the percentage increase shall be calculated by subtracting the cumulative percentage of any consecutive preceding years of decrease.(4) The department shall transmit notice to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin providing the percentage increase to be applied to the fee schedule rates under this section prior to implementing the adjustment to the fee schedule rates.(5) When fee schedule rates increase under this section, a provider shall increase the total wages of a direct support professional by the increased percentage in the Consumer Price Index under paragraph (1) no later than January 1 of the applicable fiscal year of the rate increase.(6) Beginning October 1, 2026, and each year thereafter, the department shall transmit notice to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin providing the lower bound wage rate for a direct support professional based on any increase in the fee schedule rates. No provider may pay a direct support 20250HB1939PN2447 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 professional wage below the applicable lower bound wage rate.(7) Effective July 1, 2027, if a provider does not comply with the compensation provisions under this section, the provider shall be subject to a financial penalty to be imposed by the department not to exceed an amount equal to the number of hours worked by each direct support professional who received wages lower than the lower bound wage rate multiplied by the difference between the wage the direct support professional received and the lower bound wage rate published under paragraph (6).(8) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a financial penalty collected under this section shall be deposited into the Home and Community-Based Services for Individuals with Intellectual Disabilities Augmentation Account established under section 1729-E of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code.(9) A provider shall report annually to the department the following information, in a form and manner as prescribed by the department:(i) The number of direct support professionals rendering services.(ii) The average wage of direct support professionals by each service type rendered.(iii) The starting wage of direct support professionals by each service type rendered.(iv) Information on the amount and type of compensation paid to direct support professionals, including the following:(A) Salary, wages and other remuneration under 29 U.S.C. Ch. 8 (relating to fair labor standards) and 29 CFR Pts. 531 (relating to wage payments under the Fair Labor Standards Act of 20250HB1939PN2447 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 1938) and 778 (relating to overtime compensation).(B) Benefits, including health and dental benefits, sick leave and tuition reimbursements.(C) The employer share of payroll taxes.(b) Subsection (a)(1), (2), (3), (4) and (5) shall not apply in a fiscal year in which the department establishes new fee schedule rates under 55 Pa. Code. § 6100.571.(c) As used in this section, the term "provider" means a provider of home and community-based services provided through an intellectual disability or autism program administered by the Office of Developmental Programs of the department.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1939PN2447 - 4 - 123456789101112